Arkansas, session 2025, HB1540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-418 is repealed.
26-51-418. Deductions — Child with disability — Definitions.
(a) In addition to any other state income tax deduction permitted by
law, a taxpayer in this state who is maintaining, supporting, and caring for
a totally and permanently disabled child in his or her home shall be
permitted a deduction on his or her Arkansas income taxes of five hundred
dollars ($500) for each income year that the taxpayer maintains, supports,
and cares for such totally and permanently disabled child.
(b) As used in this section:
*JLL136*
03-18-2025 11:05:37 JLL136

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1540
(1) “Child” means a natural or adopted child of the taxpayer;
and
(2)(A) “Totally and permanently disabled” means any child who is
unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any
medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can be expected to
result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last for a
continuous period of not less than twelve (12) months.
(B) A physical or mental impairment is an impairment that
results from anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities which
are demonstrable by medically acceptable clinical or laboratory diagnostic
techniques.
(c) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
adopt appropriate rules to carry out the purpose and intent of this section
and to prevent abuse of the deduction provided for in this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-503 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-503. Support of a child an individual with a developmental
disability — Definitions.
(a) In addition to the state income tax credit permitted by § 26-51-
501(a) and (b), any taxpayer in this state who is maintaining, supporting,
and caring for an individual with a diagnosis of a developmental disability
in the taxpayer's home is permitted, in addition to all other income tax
credits, a credit of five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dollars
($1,000) for each income year for that individual.
(b)(1) Any person wishing to take advantage of this tax credit must
have certification by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, or
licensed psychological examiner, licensed advanced practice registered nurse,
or licensed physician assistant that the individual has a diagnosis of a
developmental disability.
(2) A certification provided before January 1, 2025, on the form
required by the Department of Finance and Administration under this section
is effective for a person to take advantage of the tax credit allowed under
this section.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Diagnosis of a developmental disability” means a disability
of a person that:
03-18-2025 11:05:37 JLL136

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1540
(A) Is attributable to:
(i) An intellectual disability, cerebral palsy,
epilepsy, spina bifida, Down syndrome, or autism;
(ii) Another condition of the person found to be
closely related to an intellectual disability because the condition results
in an impairment of general intellectual functioning or adaptive behavior
similar to that of a person with an intellectual disability or requires
treatment and services similar to that required for a person with an
intellectual disability; or
(iii) Dyslexia resulting from a disability or
condition described in subdivision (c)(1)(A)(i) or subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii)
of this section;
(B) Originates before the person reaches twenty-two (22)
years of age;
(C) Has continued or can be expected to continue
indefinitely; and
(D) Constitutes a substantial handicap to the person's
ability to function without appropriate support services, including without
limitation:
(i) Planned recreational activities;
(ii) Medical services such as physical therapy and
speech therapy; and
(iii) Possibilities for sheltered employment or job
training "Developmental disability" means the same as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
15002, as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(2) “Individual” means a child of the taxpayer's blood, an
adopted child, or a dependent within the meaning of § 26-51-501(a)(3)(B).

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/J. Mayberry




03-18-2025 11:05:37 JLL136